Washington statutes.
RCW 17.15.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Integrated pest management" means a coordinated decision-making and action process that uses the most appropriate pest control methods and strategy in an environmentally and economically sound manner to meet agency programmatic pest management objectives. The elements of integrated pest management include:

(a) Preventing pest problems;

(b) Monitoring for the presence of pests and pest damage;

(c) Establishing the density of the pest population, that may be set at zero, that can be tolerated or correlated with a damage level sufficient to warrant treatment of the problem based on health, public safety, economic, or aesthetic thresholds;

(d) Treating pest problems to reduce populations below those levels established by damage thresholds using strategies that may include biological, cultural, mechanical, and chemical control methods and that must consider human health, ecological impact, feasibility, and cost-effectiveness; and

(e) Evaluating the effects and efficacy of pest treatments.

(2) "Pest" means, but is not limited to, any insect, rodent, nematode, snail, slug, weed, and any form of plant or animal life or virus, except virus, bacteria, or other microorganisms on or in a living person or other animal or in or on processed food or beverages or pharmaceuticals, which is normally considered to be a pest, or which the director of the department of agriculture may declare to be a pest.

[ 1997 c 357 s 2.]